District of Columbia statutes.
7-2602

Nature and contents of reports.

An oral report shall be made immediately by telephone or otherwise, and followed as soon thereafter as possible by a report in writing, to the Metropolitan Police Department of the District of Columbia. Such reports shall contain, if readily available, the name, address, and age of the injured person, and shall also contain the nature and extent of the person’s injuries, and any other information which the physician or other person required to make the report believes might be helpful in establishing the cause of the injuries and the identity of the person who caused the injuries.

History

Nov. 6, 1966, 80 Stat. 1355, Pub. L. 89-775, § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-1362.
1973 Ed., § 2-182.